Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB605.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 141.160 is amended to read as follows:
(1) All returns of income for the preceding taxable year shall be made by April 15 in
each year, except returns made on the basis of a fiscal year, which shall be made by
the fifteenth day of the fourth month following the close of the fiscal year. Blank
forms for returns of income shall be supplied by the department.
(2) Whenever, in the opinion of the department, it is necessary to examine the federal
income tax return or a copy thereof of any taxpayer in order to audit his or her
return, the department may compel the taxpayer to produce for inspection a copy of
his or her federal return and all statements and schedules in support thereof. The
department may also require copies of reports of adjustments made by the federal
government.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, all returns of income for the
preceding taxable year made by cooperatives as described in Sections 521 and 1381
of the Internal Revenue Code or by KRS Chapter 272 shall be made by September
15 in each year, except returns made on the basis of a fiscal year, which shall be
made by the fifteenth day of the ninth month following the close of the fiscal year.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/4/2026 11:43 AM Jacketed